Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.030

Deeds and waivers.

The board may require the petitioners to secure deeds and waivers of damages for the right-of-way from the landowners, and, in such case, before an examination or survey by the county road engineer is ordered, such deeds and waivers shall be filed with the board.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.030. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 20, part; RRS s 6450-20, part.]